North Carolina, session 2025, SB322.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 14-33(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) Unless his the conduct is covered under some other provision of law providing greater
punishment, any person who commits any assault, assault and battery, or affray is guilty of a
Class 1 misdemeanor if, in the course of the assault, assault and battery, or affray, he:he or she
does any of the following:
…
(9) Commits an assault and battery against a sports official when the sports
official is discharging or attempting to discharge official duties at a sports
event, or immediately after the sports event at which the sports official
discharged official duties. A "sports official" is a person at a sports event who
enforces the rules of the event, such as an umpire or referee, or a person who
supervises the participants, such as a coach. A "sports event" includes any
interscholastic or intramural athletic activity in a primary, middle, junior high,
or high school, college, or university, any organized athletic activity
sponsored by a community, business, or nonprofit organization, any athletic
activity that is a professional or semiprofessional event, and any other
organized athletic activity in the State.
(10) Assaults a utility or communications worker while the worker is (i) readily
identifiable as a worker and (ii) discharging or attempting to discharge his or
her duties. For purposes of this subdivision, the term "utility or
communications worker" means an employee of, agent of, or under contract
with an organization, entity, or company, whether State-created or privately,
municipally, county, or cooperatively owned, that provides electricity, natural
gas, telecommunications services, or internet access services. For purposes of
this subdivision, the term "readily identifiable as a worker" shall be construed
to include the worker wearing, at the time of the assault, a uniform, hat, or
other outerwear bearing the logo of the utility or communications company
for which the worker is an employee of, agent of, or under contract with."
SECTION 2. Prosecutions for offenses committed before the effective date of this
act are not abated or affected by this act, and the statutes that would be applicable but for this act
remain applicable to those prosecutions.
*S322-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective December 1, 2025, and applies to offenses
committed on or after that date.
Page 2 Senate Bill 322-First Edition